Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.340

Wilfully retaining books—Infraction.

It is a class 4 civil infraction for any person to wilfully retain any book, newspaper, magazine, pamphlet, manuscript, or other property belonging in or to any public library, reading room, or other educational institution, for thirty days after notice in writing to return the same, given after the expiration of the time that by the rules of such institution such article or other property may be kept.

[ 1987 c 456 s 29; 1935 c 119 s 17; RRS s 8226-17. Prior: 1909 c 116 s 12; 1901 c 166 s 12.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1987 c 456: See RCW 7.80.005.

Effective date—1987 c 456 ss 9-31: See RCW 7.80.901.